North Carolina, session 2025, HB279.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 153A-27.1(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) This section shall apply only in the following counties: Alamance, Alexander,
Alleghany, Avery, Beaufort, Brunswick, Buncombe, Caldwell, Carteret, Cherokee, Clay,
Cleveland, Cumberland, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Guilford, Harnett, Haywood,
Henderson, Hyde, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, McDowell, Mecklenburg, Moore,
Onslow, Pender, Polk, Randolph, Rockingham, Rutherford, Sampson, Stanly, Stokes,
Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 2. This act applies to Haywood County only.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to vacancies
filled on or after that date.
*H279-v-1*